Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2728YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 568 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. Subtract, to the extent included, 3 interest income received from a bank or credit union. 4 b. As used in this subsection: 5 (1) âBankâ means a corporation or limited liability company 6 engaged in the business of banking and organized under the laws 7 of this state, another state, or the United States. âBankâ also 8 means a savings and loan, savings association, or savings bank 9 organized under the laws of another state or the United States. 10 (2) âCredit unionâ means a cooperative, nonprofit 11 association incorporated under chapter 533 or the federal 12 Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. Â§1751 et seq., and that is insured 13 by the national credit union administration and includes an 14 office of a credit union. 15 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 16 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 17 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 18 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 19 or after that date. 20